Washington statutes.
RCW 10.27.040

Selection of grand jury members.

Members of the grand jury shall be selected in the manner provided in chapter 2.36 RCW.

[ 1988 c 188 s 17; 1971 ex.s. c 67 s 4.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.